Georgia statutes. TITLE 35 Law Enforcement Officers and Agencies
Article 1 General Provisions

35-2-1.
Creation of Board of Public Safety; composition; appointment and terms of office of members.

There is created a Board of Public Safety which shall establish the general policy to be followed by the Department of Public Safety.

The board shall consist of 16 members:

The following four members serve as follows:

The Governor, ex officio, who shall be chairperson of the board;

An appointee of the Governor who shall not be the Attorney General;

The official in charge of the Department of Corrections, ex officio; and

The commissioner of community supervision, ex officio.

Five members shall be selected as follows:

A representative appointed by the Governor by and with the advice and consent of the Senate from the membership of the Georgia Sheriffs Association; the first representative shall serve an initial term ending on January 20, 1975, each subsequent term being three years;

A representative appointed by the Governor by and with the advice and consent of the Senate from the membership of the Georgia Association of Chiefs of Police; the first representative shall serve an initial term ending on January 20, 1974, each subsequent term being three years;

A representative appointed by the Governor by and with the advice and consent of the Senate from the membership of the District Attorneys Association of Georgia; the first representative shall serve an initial term ending on January 20, 1973, each subsequent term being three years;

A representative appointed by the Governor by and with the advice and consent of the Senate from the membership of the Georgia State Firemen’s Association; the first representative shall serve an initial term ending on January 20, 1984, each subsequent term being for three years; and

A representative appointed by the Governor by and with the advice and consent of the Senate from the membership of the Georgia Association of Fire Chiefs; the first representative shall serve an initial term beginning on January 21, 2011, each term being for three years.

Four members shall be selected as follows:

Two members appointed by the Governor. The first appointees shall serve an initial term ending on January 20, 2002. Each subsequent term shall be for three years;

One member appointed by the Lieutenant Governor. The first appointee shall serve an initial term ending on January 20, 2002. Each subsequent term shall be for three years; and

One member appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives. The first appointee shall serve an initial term ending on January 20, 2002. Each subsequent term shall be for three years.

By majority vote the board shall appoint three members from the state at large; no person so appointed shall be an officer or employee of any state or local governmental entity at the time of his or her appointment to or during his or her membership on the board. All terms of the three at-large members shall be four years. Any vacancy in the at-large membership shall be filled by the board for the unexpired term.

Appointments made pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of this Code section at times when the Senate is not in session shall be effective ad interim.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, §§ 18, 1609; Ga. L. 1981, p. 814, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 426, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 1211, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 831, § 1/HB 607; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 35/HB 942; Ga. L. 2018, p. 334, § 1/HB 856.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, substituted “16” for “15” in subsection (b); substituted “four” for “three” in paragraph (b)(1); deleted “and” at the end of subparagraph (b)(1)(B); substituted “; and” for a period at the end of subparagraph (b)(1)(C); and added subparagraph (b)(1)(D).

Cross references.

Powers and duties of board with regard to Georgia Fire Academy, T. 25, C. 7.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2009, p. 831, § 2/HB 607, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to appointments made on or after January 20, 2011.

35-2-2.
Creation of Department of Public Safety.

There is created a Department of Public Safety.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, art. 1, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 1601.

35-2-3.
Commissioner of public safety—Creation; appointment and removal; powers and duties; rules and regulations.

There is created the position of commissioner of public safety. The commissioner shall be the chief administrative officer and shall be both appointed and removed by the board with the approval of the Governor. Except as otherwise provided by law and subject to the general policy established by the board, the commissioner shall supervise, direct, account for, organize, plan, administer, and execute the functions vested in the department by law.

The commissioner shall be authorized to promulgate rules and regulations as necessary to carry out his or her official duties.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 1602; Ga. L. 1996, p. 271, § 1.

35-2-4.
Commissioner of public safety — Membership in Uniform Division; reversion to original rank upon removal without prejudice from office.

The commissioner may be a member of the Uniform Division of the department and upon removal from such office without prejudice he shall revert to his original rank in the Uniform Division which he held when he was appointed to office.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 70, § 1.

35-2-5.
Commissioner of public safety — Rank in Uniform Division; chief officer.

As prescribed by the board, the commissioner may rank as senior colonel in the Uniform Division and may be the chief officer thereof or the board may appoint a colonel in the Uniform Division as the chief officer thereof.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, art. 1, § 4; Ga. L. 1949, p. 70, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 951, § 12-3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 951, § 13-1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the 2000 Act which amended this Code section became effective April 28, 2000, for purposes of authorization for appointments as provided in this Code section as amended by § 12-3 of the 2000 Act.

35-2-6.
Employment of temporary expert assistance.

In perfecting the organization of the department or any division thereof, the commissioner shall be authorized with approval of the board to employ and provide compensation for such expert temporary assistance as may be necessary.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, art. 2, § 8.

35-2-7.
Deputy commissioner of public safety — Appointment; term of office; rank; membership in Uniform Division; duties; oath.

The commissioner is vested with authority to appoint a deputy commissioner of public safety, who shall have the rank of lieutenant colonel in the Uniform Division of the department.

The deputy commissioner may be a member of the Uniform Division of the department and upon removal from office without prejudice he shall revert to the original rank in the Uniform Division which he held when he was appointed to office.

His appointment shall be subject to confirmation by the board.

The deputy commissioner shall perform such duties as he may be charged with by the commissioner, and in case of a vacancy shall act as commissioner until an appointment is made to fill the vacancy.

The deputy commissioner shall take the same oath as that required of the commissioner, which oath shall be administered by the commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 332, art. 1, § 5; Ga. L. 1943, p. 196, § 3; Ga. L. 1949, p. 70, § 3; Ga. L. 1958, p. 296, § 2; Ga. L. 1967, p. 98, § 2; Ga. L. 1969, p. 145, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 409, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1285, § 1.

35-2-8.
Comptroller — Appointment; membership in Uniform Division prohibited; bond.

The commissioner shall appoint a comptroller to ensure the proper receipt, accounting, and disbursement of funds of the department. The comptroller shall not be a member of the Uniform Division of the department. The comptroller shall give a good and sufficient surety bond in the amount of $100,000.00, payable to the Governor and his successors in office and to be approved by the commissioner, conditioned for the faithful discharge of his duties and the faithful accounting of all funds received by him.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 228, § 2.

35-2-9.
Payment of medical and other similar expenses of members of Georgia State Patrol injured in line of duty; procedure.

The department is authorized to pay all medical, surgical, hospital, nursing, and other similar expenses incurred by any member of the Georgia State Patrol as a result of injuries received in the line of duty. The department is authorized to make such payments in addition to any award made by the State Board of Workers’ Compensation based on such injuries. Such payments shall only be made upon proper presentation of bills to the comptroller of the department. The comptroller and the injured party shall together ascertain the correctness of all bills presented. No payments shall be made without the approval of the commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 392, § 1.

Cross references.

Workers’ compensation generally, T. 34, C. 9.

State employees’ health insurance, § 45-18-1 et seq.

35-2-10.
Awards to employees for outstanding service, heroism, or other exemplary acts; maximum amount of award; promulgation of rules and regulations for granting awards.

The department shall have the authority to make awards to employees of the department on behalf of the department or the state in recognition of outstanding service, heroism, or other exemplary acts arising out of the performance of their duties. All expenditures incurred in making such awards shall be defrayed from the department’s regular operating budget and shall not exceed $100.00 per award.

The board shall promulgate rules and regulations in connection with the granting of the awards provided for in this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 246, §§ 1, 2.

35-2-11.
Commissioner authorized to provide and equip lecturers for lectures and demonstrations in public schools.

The commissioner is authorized to furnish one or more lecturers to conduct lectures and demonstrations relating to public safety in the public schools in cooperation with school authorities. The commissioner may furnish such lecturers with appropriate literature and equipment.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, art. 3, § 1.

35-2-12.
Contribution to political campaigns by employees of department.

No person in the employ of the department shall, either directly or indirectly, contribute any money or any other thing of value to any person, organization, or committee for political campaign or election in county or state primaries or general elections.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 70, § 4; Ga. L. 1956, p. 573, § 1; Ga. L. 1957, p. 103, § 1; Ga. L. 1958, p. 296, § 3; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1921, § 1.

35-2-13.
Headquarters for commissioner and deputy commissioner of public safety and divisions.

The department is authorized to provide comfortable and accessible headquarters for the commissioner and deputy commissioner of public safety and for the various divisions thereof. The department is authorized and empowered to provide such quarters and offices by purchase, lease, or construction, any contract made or title acquired to be made in the name of and on behalf of the State of Georgia.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, § 10.

35-2-14.
“Peace officer” defined; enforcement of immigration and custom laws.

As used in this Code section, the term “peace officer” means peace officer as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (8) of Code Section 35-8-2, as amended.

The commissioner is authorized and directed to negotiate the terms of a memorandum of understanding between the State of Georgia and the United States Department of Justice or Department of Homeland Security concerning the enforcement of federal immigration and customs laws, detention and removals, and investigations in the State of Georgia.

The memorandum of understanding negotiated pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section shall be signed on behalf of the state by the commissioner and the Governor or as otherwise required by the appropriate federal agency.

The commissioner shall annually designate no fewer than ten peace officers to apply to be trained pursuant to the memorandum of understanding provided for in subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section. Such training shall be funded pursuant to any federal Homeland Security Appropriation Act or any subsequent source of federal funding. The provisions of this subsection shall become effective upon such funding.

A peace officer certified as trained in accordance with the memorandum of understanding as provided in this Code section is authorized to enforce federal immigration and customs laws while performing within the scope of his or her authorized duties.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-2-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 105, § 4/SB 529; Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 10/HB 87.

Cross references.

Registration of Immigration Assistance Act, §

43-20A-1

et seq.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2006, “customs” was substituted for “custom” near the end of subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 105, § 1/SB 529, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Security and Immigration Compliance Act.’ All requirements of this Act concerning immigration or the classification of immigration status shall be construed in conformity with federal immigration law.”

The provisions of subsection (d) of this Code section become effective upon funding provided pursuant to the federal Homeland Security Appropriation Act of 2006, Public Law 109-90, or any subsequent source of federal funding. Federal funds were appropriated in 2008.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 1/HB 87, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Illegal Immigration Reform and Enforcement Act of 2011.’ ”

Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 21/HB 87, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability, and provides, in part, that: “(b) The terms of this Act regarding immigration shall be construed to have the meanings consistent with such terms under federal immigration law.

“(c)
The provisions of this Act shall be implemented in a manner consistent with federal laws governing immigration and civil rights.”

Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 22/HB 87, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section shall apply to offenses and violations occurring on or after July 1, 2011.

Law reviews.

For article on 2006 enactment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 247 (2006).

For article, “The Georgia Security and Immigration Compliance Act: Comprehensive Immigration Reform in Georgia — ‘Think Globally . . . Act Locally’,” see 13 Ga. St. B. J. 14 (2007).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 35 (2011).

For article, “State Government:
Illegal Immigration Reform and Enforcement Act of 2011,” see 28 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 51 (2011).

For article, “Taming Immigration:
The 64th Henry J. Miller Distinguished Lecture Series Remarks,” see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 971 (2020).

35-2-15.
Off-duty use of motor vehicles and other equipment by certain law enforcement officers; conditions for use; rules and regulations.

Certified law enforcement officers employed by the department may use a department motor vehicle while working an off-duty job if such job requires vested police powers as a condition of employment, has been approved by the commissioner, and has been determined by the commissioner to be in furtherance of the department’s mission and service to the state. Department motor vehicles used for off-duty employment shall not be used at any political function.

Except as otherwise provided for in this subsection, department motor vehicles shall be used only in the discharge of official duties.

Any other equipment shall be used only with the express written approval of the commissioner. The commissioner shall adopt rules and regulations governing the use of equipment subject to approval of the Board of Public Safety.

The commissioner, in his or her sole discretion, in granting approval for such off-duty job in which a department motor vehicle is used, prior to the use of such vehicle, shall determine whether the off-duty employer provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section shall reimburse the department for use of the vehicle. When reimbursement is required, such off-duty employer shall enter into a written agreement with the department to pay an amount determined by the commissioner to be sufficient to reimburse the department for the use of the vehicle and to pay the off-duty employee sufficient compensation. Pursuant to such agreement, the department shall pay the employee of the department the compensation earned on off-duty employment whenever such employee performs such service in a department motor vehicle; provided, however, that such compensation shall not be characterized as direct employment compensation but shall be paid as services under contract.

Employees of the department operating a department motor vehicle pursuant to this Code section shall be deemed to be acting within the scope of their official duties and employment within the meaning of Code Section 50-21-20, et seq., and the commissioner of administrative services shall provide liability coverage for claims arising out of such use. The commissioner shall adopt rules and regulations governing the use of equipment subject to approval of the Board of Public Safety.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-2-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 385, § 3/HB 806; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 35/HB 323.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “in the discharge” for “in discharge” in paragraph (a)(2); and substituted “a department” for “a departmental” in the first sentence of subsection (b).

Administrative rules and regulations.

Off-duty police employment, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Public Safety, Chapter 570-9.

35-2-16.
Subsistence and per diem for employees; retention of badge and weapon upon retirement; salary increases; impact on other statutory provisions.

The commissioner shall be authorized to provide for a subsistence and per diem allowance for employees of the department.

The commissioner shall be authorized to pay to sworn employees of the department additional compensation upon any such employee’s retirement in the form of the badge and the duty weapon issued by the department to such employee.

The commissioner shall be authorized to grant a salary increase to those sworn employees of the department and those communications officers who have obtained degrees from an accredited member of the Federation of Regional Accrediting Commissions of Higher Education or who have obtained a degree of completion from some other educational institution with respect to a course of instruction related to law enforcement, so long as both the course of instruction and the institution are specifically approved by the commissioner.

This Code section is not intended to repeal existing law concerning the following:

The authority of the board to pay certain medical expenses incurred by any member of the Georgia State Patrol or the Georgia Bureau of Investigation;

The authority of the commissioner to provide uniforms and supplies to members of the Uniform Division; or

The requirement that board and quarters be furnished to every member of the Uniform Division on active duty.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-2-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 2021, p. 463, § 1/SB 198.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 4, 2021.